New York, session 2025-2026, A212.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 4148 of the public health law, as 2 added by chapter 352 of the laws of 2013, is amended to read as follows: 3 5. Licensed funeral directors and undertakers shall support the estab- 4 lishment and maintenance of the electronic death registration system 5 through a payment, tendered for each burial and removal permit issued to 6 a licensed funeral director or undertaker, in the amount of [twenty] 7 five dollars, provided that such payment shall be considered a cost of 8 operation and the funeral director or undertaker shall not charge any 9 additional fee related to such payment for funeral or other services. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00345-01-5